North Dakota, session 69, SB2100.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Section 23-27-04.3 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
23-27-04.3. Emergency medical services personnel training, testing, certification, licensure,
and quality review - Penalty.
1. The department of health and human services shall adopt rules prescribing minimum training,
testing, certification, licensure, and quality review standards for emergency medical services
personnel, including community emergency medical services personnel, instructors, and
training institutions.
2. Rules adopted must include a definition of minimum applicable standards, a definition of
emergency medical services personnel, provide for a mechanism for certifying or licensing
persons who have met the required standards, provide a mechanism to review and improve
the quality of care rendered by emergency medical services personnel, and define minimum
standards for emergency medical services training institutions.
3. Rules adopted must allow emergency medical services instructors to provide direct, entry-
level certification training for the levels of emergency medical responder and emergency
medical technician, under the oversight of the department and without the requirements of an
emergency medical services training institute.
4. Licensing as an emergency medical services training institution is optional.
5. It is a class B misdemeanor for an individual to willfully misrepresent that individual's
certification or licensing status as emergency medical services personnel.
6. Quality review and improvement information, data, records, and proceedings are not subject
to subpoena or discovery or introduction into evidence in any civil action.

S. B. NO. 2100 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
President of the Senate Speaker of the House
____________________________ ____________________________
Secretary of the Senate Chief Clerk of the House
This certifies that the within bill originated in the Senate of the Sixty-ninth Legislative Assembly of North
Dakota and is known on the records of that body as Senate Bill No. 2100.
Senate Vote: Yeas 44 Nays 1 Absent 2
House Vote: Yeas 91 Nays 0 Absent 3
____________________________
Secretary of the Senate
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State